Utah statutes.
56-1-10.   Maps of final location to be filed.

Every company constructing or operating a railroad in this state shall within a reasonable time after the final location of the road file with the Division of Corporations and Commercial Code a map thereof showing the route decided upon and the land obtained for the use thereof; and like maps of the several parts thereof located in the several counties through or into which the road may be extended shall be filed in the offices of the recorders of such counties respectively. Maps and profiles certified by the chief engineer, the president, and the secretary of the company shall be filed in the office of the company subject to examination by any person interested.



Amended by Chapter 67, 1984 General Session

